Washington statutes.
RCW 43.110.030

Municipal research and services.

(1) The department of commerce must contract for the provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and services must be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such support.

(2) Municipal research and services consists of:

(a) Studying and researching city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(c) Providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city, town, and county government; and

(e)(i) For any ordinance, resolution, or policy adopted by a city, town, or county that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area, posting:

(A) A summary of the ordinance, resolution, or policy; and

(B) An internet link to the ordinance, resolution, or policy, or the relevant portion of the actual language of the ordinance, resolution, or policy.

(ii) Information provided by cities, towns, and counties regarding an ordinance, resolution, or policy under (e)(i) of this subsection must be posted in a specific section on a website maintained by the entity with which the department of commerce contracts for the provision of municipal research and services under this section, and must list by jurisdiction all applicable requirements. Cities, towns, and counties must provide information for posting on the website in accordance with RCW 64.06.080.

(3) Requests for legal services by county officials must be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the department of commerce to county requests for legal services must be provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.

(4) The department of commerce must coordinate with the association of Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties in carrying out the activities in this section.

[ 2016 c 138 s 2; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 5; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 5; 2010 c 271 s 701; 2000 c 227 s 3; 1997 c 437 s 2; 1990 c 104 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 5: See note following RCW 43.135.045.

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.

Effective date—2000 c 227: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2000." [ 2000 c 227 s 5.]

Effective date—1997 c 437: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1997." [ 1997 c 437 s 6.]